Colorado statutes. TITLE 2 Legislative
ARTICLE 5 COLORADO REVISED STATUTES
2-5-121. Report deposited - 1973 supplement to Colorado Revised Statutes 1963. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 74:

Entire section added, p. 425, § 1, effective May 7.

L. 83:

(1) amended, p. 381, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 276, § 2, effective August 8.

2-5-122. Enactment. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 74:

Entire section added, p. 425, § 1, effective May 7.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 277, § 3, effective August 8.

2-5-123. Publishing - publication - effective date. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 74:

Entire section added, p. 426, § 1, effective May 7.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 381, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 277, § 4, effective August 8.

2-5-124. Validation of Colorado Revised Statutes and replacement volumes and supplements thereto - effective date - proceedings of the committee on legal services.

The printing, publication, and certification of Colorado Revised Statutes, originally entitled Colorado Revised Statutes 1973, and replacement volumes and certain supplements thereto, the deposit with the secretary of state by the committee on legal services of a copy thereof, and the publication of notice thereof with the effective date of Colorado Revised Statutes, originally entitled Colorado Revised Statutes 1973, and replacement volumes and supplements thereto, containing all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature enacted at the regular and extraordinary sessions held subsequent to the 1973 session, as set forth with particularity in section 2-5-125, have been completed and are accepted, approved, ratified, confirmed, and validated as a full compliance with this article for the following publications:

Colorado Revised Statutes 1973 and the 1973 supplement to Colorado Revised Statutes 1963. The effective and operative date of Colorado Revised Statutes 1973, including the 1973 supplement to Colorado Revised Statutes 1963, which contains all of the laws of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature enacted through the 1973 session of the Colorado general assembly, is fixed as December 31, 1974.

1975 supplement to Colorado Revised Statutes 1973. The effective and operative date is fixed as March 1, 1976, for the 1975 supplement.

1976 supplement to Colorado Revised Statutes 1973. The effective and operative date is fixed as July 1, 1977, for the 1976 supplement.

1978 supplement to Colorado Revised Statutes 1973 and replacement volumes 5, 8, and 12. The effective and operative date is fixed as February 1, 1978, for volume 12, 1977 replacement volume, and is fixed as May 1, 1979, for the 1978 supplement and volumes 5 and 8, 1978 replacement volumes.

1979 supplement to Colorado Revised Statutes 1973. The effective and operative date is fixed as April 7, 1980, for the 1979 supplement.

1980 supplement to Colorado Revised Statutes 1973 and replacement volume 1B. The effective and operative date is fixed as May 1, 1981, for the 1980 supplement and for volume 1B, 1980 replacement volume.

1981 supplement to Colorado Revised Statutes 1973. The effective and operative date is fixed as February 19, 1982, for the 1981 supplement.

1982 supplement to Colorado Revised Statutes 1973 and replacement volumes 10, 11, 16A, and 16B. The effective and operative date is fixed as February 15, 1983, for the 1982 supplement and for volumes 10, 11, 16A, and 16B, 1982 replacement volumes.

1983 supplement to Colorado Revised Statutes. The effective and operative date is fixed as March 27, 1984, for the 1983 supplement.

1984 supplement and special supplement to Colorado Revised Statutes and replacement volumes 14 and 17. (I) The effective and operative date is fixed as May 23, 1985, for the 1984 supplement and for volumes 14 and 17, 1984 replacement volumes.

(II) The effective and operative date is fixed as May 23, 1985, for that portion of the publication entitled "Special Supplement 1984 Voter-approved Changes and Court Rules Update", which contains the law amending title 1, C.R.S., in volume 1B, as enacted by the people at the general election on November 6, 1984.

1985 supplement to Colorado Revised Statutes and replacement volume 5. The effective and operative date is fixed as February 28, 1986, for the 1985 supplement and for volume 5, 1985 replacement volume.

1986 supplement to Colorado Revised Statutes and replacement volumes 3A, 3B, 8A, 8B, 12A, and 12B. The effective and operative date is fixed as April 17, 1987, for the 1986 supplement and for volumes 3A, 3B, 8A, 8B, 12A, and 12B, 1986 replacement volumes.

1987 supplement to Colorado Revised Statutes and replacement volumes 4A, 4B, 6A, and 6B. The effective and operative date is fixed as April 5, 1988, for the 1987 supplement and for volumes 4A, 4B, 6A, and 6B, 1987 replacement volumes.

1988 supplement to Colorado Revised Statutes and replacement volumes 9, 10A, and 10B. The effective and operative date is fixed as February 21, 1989, for the 1988 supplement and for volumes 9, 10A, and 10B, 1988 replacement volumes.

1989 supplement to Colorado Revised Statutes and replacement volumes 11A and 11B. The effective and operative date is fixed as February 16, 1990, for the 1989 supplement and for volumes 11A and 11B, 1989 replacement volumes.

1990 supplement to Colorado Revised Statutes and replacement volume 15. The effective and operative date is fixed as April 2 for the 1990 supplement and for volume 15, 1990 replacement volume.

1991 supplement and 1991 special supplement to Colorado Revised Statutes and replacement volumes 5A and 5B. The effective and operative date is fixed as May 21, 1992, for the 1991 supplement, the 1991 special supplement, and volumes 5A and 5B, 1991 replacement volumes.

1992 supplement to Colorado Revised Statutes and replacement volume 2. The effective and operative date is fixed as March 26, 1993, for the 1992 supplement and volume 2, 1992 replacement volume.

1993 supplement to Colorado Revised Statutes and replacement volume 17. The effective and operative date is fixed as February 7, 1994, for the 1993 supplement and volume 17, 1993 replacement volume.

1994 supplement to Colorado Revised Statutes and replacement volumes 4A and 16B. The effective and operative date is fixed as February 23, 1995, for the 1994 supplement and volumes 4A and 16B, 1994 replacement volumes.

1995 supplement to Colorado Revised Statutes and replacement volumes 9 and 14. The effective and operative date is fixed as February 13, 1996, for the 1995 supplement and volumes 9 and 14, 1995 replacement volumes.

1996 supplement to Colorado Revised Statutes. The effective and operative date is fixed as February 21, 1997, for the 1996 supplement.

All proceedings of the committee on legal services, including the contract for publication, the provisions for distribution thereof between state and public subscribers, and the corresponding price costs thereof, are accepted, approved, ratified, confirmed, and validated.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 230, § 1, effective July 14.

L. 77:

Entire section R&RE, p. 266, § 1, effective May 27.

L. 78:

(1)(c) added, p. 250, § 1, effective May 6.

L. 80:

IP(1) amended and (1)(d) added, p. 442, § 1, effective April 1.

L. 81:

(1)(e) added, p. 349, § 1, effective April 22.

L. 82:

(1)(f) added, p. 223, § 1, effective February 19.

L. 83:

(1)(g) added, p. 383, § 1, effective February 14; IP(1) amended, p. 381, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(1)(h) and (1)(i) added, p. 282, § 1, effective March 26.

L. 85:

(1)(h) amended and (1)(j) added, p. 291, § 1, effective May 22.

L. 86:

(1)(k) added, p. 428, § 1, effective February 27.

L. 87:

(1)(l) added, p. 351, § 1, effective April 16.

L. 88:

(1) R&RE, p. 321, § 1, effective April 4.

L. 89:

(1)(n) added, p. 343, § 1, effective February 17.

L. 90:

(1)(o) added, p. 340, § 1, effective February 15.

L. 91:

(1)(p) added, p. 1942, § 1, effective April 1.

L. 92:

(1)(q) added, p. 2162, § 1, effective May 20.

L. 93:

(1)(r) added, p. 74, § 1, effective March 26.

L. 94:

(1)(s) added, p. 2, § 1, effective February 4.

L. 95:

(1)(t) added, p. 1, § 1, effective February 22.

L. 96:

(1)(u) added, p. 7, § 1, effective February 13.

L. 97:

(1)(v) added, p. 2, § 1, effective February 20.